Utah statutes.
31A-30-204.   Employer responsibilities -- Defined contribution
arrangements.
(1) (a) (i)  An employer described in Subsection 31A-30-203(1) that chooses to
participate in a defined contribution arrangement may not offer a major
medical health benefit plan that is not a part of the defined contribution
arrangement to an employee.
(ii)  Subsection (1)(a)(i) does not prohibit the offer of supplemental or
limited benefit policies such as dental or vision coverage, or other types of
federally qualified savings accounts for health care expenses.
(b) (i)  To the extent permitted by the risk adjustment plan adopted under
Section 31A-42-202, the employer reserves the right to determine:
(A)  the criteria for employee eligibility, enrollment, and participation in
the employer's health benefit plan; and
(B)  the amount of the employer's contribution to that plan.
(ii)  The determinations made under Subsection (1)(b) may only be changed
during periods of open enrollment.
(2)  An employer that chooses to establish a defined contribution arrangement
to provide a health benefit plan for its employees shall:
(a)  establish a mechanism for its employees to use pre-tax dollars to
purchase a health benefit plan from the defined contribution arrangement
market on the Internet portal created in Section 63M-1-2504, which may
include:
(i)  a health reimbursement arrangement;
(ii)  a Section 125 Cafeteria plan; or
(iii)  another plan or arrangement similar to Subsection (2)(a)(i) or (ii)
which is excluded or deducted from gross income under the Internal Revenue
Code;
(b)  by November 10 of the open enrollment period:
(i)  inform each employee of the health benefit plan the employer has selected
as the default health benefit plan for the employer group;
(ii)  offer each employee a choice of any of the health benefit plans
available through the defined contribution arrangement market on the Internet
portal; and
(iii)  notify the employee that the employee will be enrolled in the default
health benefit plan selected by the employer and payroll deductions initiated
for premium payments, unless the employee, prior to November 25 of the open
enrollment period:
(A)  notifies the employer that the employee has selected a different health
benefit plan available through the defined contribution arrangement in the
Internet portal;
(B)  provides proof of coverage from another health benefit plan; or
(C)  specifically declines coverage in a health benefit plan.
(3)  An employer shall enroll an employee in the default health benefit plan
selected by the employer if the employee does not make one of the choices
described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) prior to November 25 of the open enrollment
period.
(4)  The employer's notice to the employee under Subsection (2)(b)(iii) shall
inform the employee that the failure to act under Subsections (2)(b)(iii)(A)
through (C) is considered an affirmative election under pre-tax payroll
deductions for the employer to begin payroll deductions for health benefit
plan premiums.
